District of Columbia statutes.
25-721

Hours of sale and delivery for wholesalers and manufacturers.

(a)

A licensee under a wholesaler’s license shall sell and deliver alcoholic beverages only between the hours of 6:00 a.m. and 1:00 a.m., Monday through Saturday; provided, that licensees may also make deliveries between 5:00 a.m. and 6:00 a.m., Monday through Saturday.

(b)

In addition to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the licensee under a wholesaler’s license, class A or B, may deliver alcoholic beverages to a license under a temporary license, class F or G, license between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 9:00 p.m. on Sunday.

(c)

A manufacturer’s license, class A, B, or C may sell and deliver alcoholic beverages between the hours of 7:00 a.m. and midnight, Monday through Sunday.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-81, § 2, 61 DCR 173
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-270, § 2(e)(4), 62 DCR 1866

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-81 deleted “a manufacturer’s license or” preceding “a wholesaler’s license” in (a); deleted “a manufacturer’s license, class A or B, or” preceding “a wholesaler’s license” in (b); and added (c).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-270 substituted “class A, B, or C” I for “class A or B,” in (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Inaugural Celebration Extension of Hours Public Safety Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-616, December 19, 2008, 56 DCR 44).